Arkansas, session 2025, HB1472.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 26, Chapter 52, Subchapter 4, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
26-52-457. Parts to repair agricultural equipment and machinery or
timber equipment and machinery — Parts and services to repair grain bins.
(a) As used in this section:
(1) "Agricultural equipment and machinery" means implements used
exclusively and directly in a commercial agricultural production in this
state; and
(2) "Timber equipment and machinery" means implements used
*JLL180*
02/12/2025 5:38:54 PM JLL180

HB1472
exclusively in the commercial production, harvesting, or processing of timber
in this state.
(b) The gross receipts or gross proceeds derived from the sale of the
following are exempt from the gross receipts tax levied by this chapter and
the compensating use tax levied by the Arkansas Compensating Tax Act of 1949,
§ 26-53-101 et seq.:
(1) Parts purchased to repair, either in whole or in part,
existing agricultural equipment and machinery or timber equipment and
machinery; and
(2) Parts and services purchased to repair, either in whole or
in part, a grain bin.

SECTION 2. EFFECTIVE DATE. Section 1 of this act is effective on and
after January 1, 2026.






















02/12/2025 5:38:54 PM JLL180